Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 14. Budget Committee

§ 1147.
Advisory budget committee creation; duties.

If a municipality creates an advisory budget committee as provided in

17 V.S.A. § 2646

, the committee shall evaluate the municipality’s budget and make recommendations to the selectboard for the budget based on its findings.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 106

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.